Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Chapter 2 County Workhouses
41-2-128. Prisoners who may apply for release — Procedure.

Whenever any person has been sentenced to undergo imprisonment in a county workhouse, referred to as the “workhouse” in this chapter, for the commission of a crime defined as a misdemeanor by the laws of the state of Tennessee, the county board of commissioners, if there is one, or, otherwise, the judge of the circuit court, criminal court or general sessions court having jurisdiction in the county where the person is imprisoned, upon application made therefore by the warden, superintendent, prison keeper or other administrative head of a workhouse, may, by order, direct the warden, superintendent, prison keeper or other administrative head of a workhouse to permit the prisoner to leave the workhouse during necessary and reasonable hours for the purpose of working at the prisoner's employment, conducting the prisoner's own business or other self-employed occupation, including, in the case of a woman, housekeeping and attending to the needs of the woman's family, seeking employment, attendance at an educational institution or securing medical treatment. Similarly, the judge of the circuit court, criminal court or general sessions court having jurisdiction in the county where the person is imprisoned may, upon application of the sheriff, enter a like order for the same purpose for jail prisoners. The order may be rescinded or modified at any time with or without notice to the prisoner.

Whenever any person has been sentenced to undergo imprisonment in a county workhouse due to the violation of a criminal statute that is a felony under the laws of the state of Tennessee, then the individual may be allowed to leave the county workhouse during necessary and reasonable hours for occupational, scholastic or medical purposes. Any individual serving a felony sentence based on a crime against person or property who has a previous sentence defined as a felony against person or property, as defined by the laws of the state of Tennessee or any other state of the United States or by the criminal statutes of the government of the United States, shall not be eligible to apply for release from the county workhouse during reasonable and necessary hours for occupational, scholastic or medical purposes as provided in §§ 41-2-127 — 41-2-132.

Notwithstanding this section, § 55-10-402 or § 55-50-504(a)(2) to the contrary, the judge may sentence persons convicted of a second violation of § 55-10-401 or § 55-50-504(a)(2), to the work release program established pursuant to this section if, prior to doing so, the following conditions have been met:

An investigative report is completed and considered by the judge, with the report confirming the defendant's employment and the employer's willingness to participate in the work release program, including, but not limited to, reports to monitor the defendant's attendance, performance and response to treatment;

A plan acceptable to the judge is established to provide for the monitoring of the defendant's whereabouts while at or on the defendant's job; and

The defendant agrees to defray, to the best of the defendant's ability, the cost of incarceration and treatment.

No person convicted of a second violation of § 55-10-401 that results in personal injury to, or the death of, another shall be sentenced to the work release program.

As a condition to participation in the work release program, the defendant must agree to be screened, at least daily, for the purpose of determining whether the defendant has consumed alcohol or illegal drugs.

A defendant permitted to participate in a work release program pursuant to this section shall not be permitted to operate a motor vehicle while participating in the program and shall at all times, when not actually at the place of employment or while being transported to or from the place of employment, remain in actual incarceration as provided by law.

The judge shall, at the time of sentencing, cause the sentencing order to reflect the defendant's cost of incarceration and treatment and shall affix to the order, taking into consideration the defendant's ability to pay, the time and manner in which the costs are to be paid. The court shall enter the necessary orders requiring that the costs of incarceration and treatment be paid or secured, including, but not limited to, orders of probation that include, as a condition thereof, the payment of costs covered by this subdivision (c)(5).

When a defendant alleges inability to pay pursuant to the terms set out by the order, the defendant may petition the court for modification as to the terms of payment. When it is determined that the defendant is unable to pay the entirety of the costs covered by this subdivision (c)(5) in the time and manner imposed by the court, any costs imposed against the defendant shall be pursuant to a schedule promulgated by the chief administrative officer of the county, or the officer's designee, with the schedule to be based upon the defendant's ability to pay the same.

In promulgating the schedule governing costs and the amount thereof to be paid by the defendant, the chief administrative officer of the county, or the officer's designee, shall consider the defendant's ability to pay and the disbursement schedule set forth in § 41-2-129 and shall incorporate payments ordered in this subsection (c) into the schedule.

In no event shall a person be denied access to this program or be denied discharge from incarceration as a result of that person's inability to pay.

A county that permits a person convicted of a second offense violation of § 55-10-401 to be sentenced to a work release program shall maintain records sufficient to allow an annual determination of whether participation in any way diminishes the effectiveness of § 55-10-402.

On an annual basis, the county legislative body shall conduct a public hearing to examine, monitor and evaluate the work release program operating under the authority of this subsection (c) to ensure that all requirements of this subsection (c) are being complied with and that the program is being operated in accordance with this subsection (c). As part of the public hearing, the county legislative body shall discuss the program's effectiveness and compliance and hear the opinions of the public concerning the program. The county legislative body shall give notice of the public hearing at least thirty (30) days prior to the meeting.

If the county legislative body finds through its public hearing or any other information the body may obtain that the work release program is being operated in compliance with this subsection (c), it shall so certify the program. The certification shall be transmitted to all judges having jurisdiction over the offense of driving under the influence of an intoxicant in the county.

If the board finds that a work release program is not being operated in compliance with this subsection (c), it shall not certify the program. The failure of certification shall be transmitted to all judges having jurisdiction over the offense of driving under the influence of an intoxicant in the county.

Acts 1967, ch. 259, § 2; 1972, ch. 626, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 36; 1980, ch. 692, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 41-1238; Acts 1990, ch. 1065, § 1; 1991, ch. 269, § 1; 1991, ch. 472, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 902, §§ 1-3; 1995, ch. 187, § 1; 2002, ch. 628, § 1; 2013, ch. 154, §§ 39, 40.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of work release for those convicted twice of driving under the influence, OAG 90-42, 1990 Tenn. AG LEXIS 46 (3/28/90).

Work release for DUI second offenders, OAG 97-021, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 12 (3/5/97).

County may charge work release participants for board despite state housing compensation, OAG 99-081, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 81 (4/5/99).

41-2-129. Wages or salary of employed prisoners — Liability of prisoner for prisoner’s board in the workhouse — Work release.

When a prisoner is employed for wages or salary, the warden, superintendent or other person in charge of the workhouse shall collect the wages or salary or require the prisoner to turn over the prisoner's wages or salary when received; and the warden, superintendent or other person in charge of the workhouse shall deposit the wages or salary in a trust checking account and shall keep a ledger showing the status of the account of each prisoner. In the case of a jail prisoner, the sheriff shall collect the wages or salary of the prisoner or require the prisoner to turn over the wages or salary when received and shall perform the duties prescribed in this subsection (a) for the warden, superintendent or other person in the case of workhouse prisoners.

Every prisoner gainfully employed shall be liable for the cost of that prisoner's board in the workhouse, as fixed by the county commissioners.

If necessarily absent from the workhouse at a meal time, a prisoner shall, at the prisoner's request, be furnished with an adequate nourishing lunch to carry to work.

The warden, superintendent or other person in charge of the workhouse shall charge the prisoner's account if the prisoner has one for such board.

If the prisoner is gainfully self-employed, the prisoner shall pay for such board, in default of which the prisoner's privilege under §§ 41-2-127 — 41-2-132 shall be automatically forfeited.

If the workhouse food is furnished directly by the county, the warden, superintendent or other person in charge of the workhouse shall account for and pay over such board payments to the county.

The same provisions shall apply in the case of jail prisoners, except that the county legislative body shall have and exercise the duties and authority prescribed for the county board of commissioners in the case of workhouse prisoners and the sheriff shall have and exercise the duties and authority prescribed for the warden, superintendent or other person in the case of workhouse prisoners.

By order of the county board of commissioners, or county legislative body if there is no county board of commissioners, or in the case of jail prisoners, the wages or salaries of employed prisoners shall be disbursed for the following purposes in the order stated:

The board of the prisoner;

Necessary travel expenses to and from work and other incidental expenses of the prisoner;

Support of the prisoner's dependents, if any, the amount to be determined by the local governing body of the county workhouse or by the county legislative body in the case of jail prisoners;

Payment of docket costs connected with the commitment of the person;

Payment, either in full or ratably, of the prisoner's obligations acknowledged by the prisoner in writing or that have been reduced to judgment;

After deductions are made in accordance with subdivisions (c)(1)-(5), two dollars ($2.00), if there is at least a balance of two dollars ($2.00) in the account, shall be deducted each month from a prisoner's trust account for any month the prisoner is gainfully employed, to be applied to the county-operated victim's assistance program, if such a program exists in the county; and

After deductions are made in accordance with subdivisions (c)(1)-(6), four dollars ($4.00), if there is at least a balance of four dollars ($4.00) in the account, shall be deducted each month from a prisoner's trust account for any month the prisoner is gainfully employed, to be directly applied to satisfy any judgments, against the prisoner, for restitution in favor of the victim.

As an alternative to the procedures described in subsections (a), (b) and (c), the sentencing court may place a prisoner on work release subject to the terms and conditions that the sheriff and the sentencing court may agree upon.

Acts 1967, ch. 259, §§ 3, 4; 1972, ch. 626, §§ 3, 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., §§ 41-1239, 41-1240; Acts 1991, ch. 383, § 1; 1998, ch. 746, § 1; 2000, ch. 655, § 1; 2011, ch. 261, § 1.

Cross-References. Earnings of inmates deposited in trust accounts, establishment and payment of daily room and board rate, § 41-21-511.

Attorney General Opinions. County may charge work release participants for board despite state housing compensation, OAG 99-081, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 81 (4/5/99).

41-2-130. Employment of prisoners in another county.

The county board of commissioners, or county legislative body if there is no county board of commissioners, may, by order, authorize the warden, superintendent or other person in charge of the workhouse to whom the prisoner is committed to arrange with another warden, superintendent or other person in charge of a workhouse for the employment of the prisoner in the other's county and, while so employed, to be in the other's custody but in other respects to be and continue subject to the commitment.

In like manner, the county legislative body may authorize the sheriff to so arrange with the sheriff of another county, in the case of jail prisoners, for employment of any such prisoner in the other's county, to be in that sheriff's custody while so employed but in all other respects to be and continue subject to the commitment.

Acts 1967, ch. 259, § 5; 1972, ch. 626, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 41-1241.

Cross-References. Work contracts with other counties, § 41-2-124.

Law Reviews.

Jail Fees and Court Costs for the Indigent Criminal Defendant: An Examination of the Tennessee Procedure, 35 Tenn. L. Rev. 74 (1968).

41-2-131. Grounds for refusal to release prisoner.

The warden, superintendent or other person in charge of a workhouse may refuse to permit the prisoner to exercise the privilege to leave the workhouse for any breach of discipline or other violation of workhouse regulations. Similarly, the sheriff may refuse to permit the prisoner to exercise the privilege to leave the jail for any breach of discipline or other violation of jail regulations.

Acts 1967, ch. 259, § 6; 1972, ch. 626, § 6; T.C.A., § 41-1242.

41-2-132. Contracts with other governmental agencies for accepting work release prisoners.

The warden, superintendent, prison keeper or other administrative head of a workhouse shall be authorized, with the approval of the local governing body of the county workhouse, to jointly contract with any other governmental agency, whether federal, state, county or municipal, with regard to accepting prisoners in custody of such other governmental agency or agencies for purposes of participation in the work release program under §§ 41-2-127 — 41-2-132. Also, the sheriff may, with the approval of the county legislative body, contract with another unit of government with regard to accepting prisoners in the custody of that government for the purpose of participating in the work release program.

Acts 1967, ch. 259, § 7; 1972, ch. 626, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 41-1243.

41-2-133. Institution of work release programs by counties — Costs.

All counties in the state, except as provided in subsection (b), may institute a work release program in accordance with this chapter.

This section shall not apply to any county having a population, according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than nor more than

14,400 14,500

19,500 19,600

20,200 20,300

28,000 28,100

30,400 30,500

The state's share of the cost imposed on local governments by the work release program as instituted by this section shall be funded by the increase in state taxes apportioned by law to cities and counties that are not specifically earmarked for a particular purpose.

Acts 1967, ch. 285, § 1; 1973, ch. 87, § 1; 1980, ch. 911, §§ 1, 4, 5; T.C.A., § 41-1244.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Roster of inmate release privileges, title 41, ch. 21, part 7.

41-2-134. Commission created to authorize work release.

There is created a commission to authorize prisoners to come under a work release program whenever any person has been committed to the workhouse or similar place of confinement and to approve educational programs established pursuant to § 41-2-145.

The commission, as authorized in this section, is authorized and empowered to permit the defendant to leave the workhouse during approved working hours to work at a place of employment and to earn a living to meet, in whole or in part, the cost of the prisoner's current financial obligations; provided, that the prisoner returns to the workhouse each day after work and that the prisoner is released only for related rehabilitative purposes as recommended by the correctional/rehabilitation work release coordinator.

In any county having a population of not less than eight hundred twenty-five thousand (825,000) nor more than eight hundred thirty thousand (830,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and in any county having a metropolitan form of government and a population of not less than one hundred thousand (100,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the commission shall be composed of not more than twelve (12) members nor less than three (3) members, who shall meet as three-member panels for the purpose of reviewing and approving applications for work release.

In other counties, the commission shall be composed of three (3) members.

In all counties:

The sheriff or workhouse superintendent shall appoint the members of the commission, subject to the approval of the county legislative body;

Each member shall serve a four-year term; and

A person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The commission shall meet weekly or at the call of the sheriff at the sheriff's office.

Acts 1967, ch. 285, § 2; 1973, ch. 87, § 1; 1977, ch. 395, § 1; 1980, ch. 911, § 2; T.C.A., § 41-1245; Acts 1986, ch. 744, §§ 20, 21; 1995, ch. 472, § 1; 1996, ch. 849, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Inmate labor may benefit private party, OAG 03-075, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 91 (6/18/03).

Workhouse inmates eligible to earn T.C.A. § 41-2-147 sentence credits can earn such credits for working for a private employer if such labor is part of a court-approved work release program or a work release program operated under a commission established pursuant to this section, OAG 03-125, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 145 (9/29/03).

41-2-135. Petition to come under the work release program.

A prisoner desiring to come under the work release program shall file a petition with the work release coordinator of the correctional/rehabilitation division. The petition must be joined in by the sheriff and concurred in by the warden of the workhouse and approved by the commission.

Acts 1967, ch. 285, § 3; 1973, ch. 87, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-1246.

41-2-136. Grounds for removal from program.

Any prisoner placed under the work release program may be taken out of the program for just cause by the commission. In the event a prisoner is taken out of the work release program, the prisoner shall remain in the workhouse and complete the sentence.

Acts 1967, ch. 285, § 4; 1973, ch. 87, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-1247.

Cross-References. Escape, § 39-16-605.

41-2-137. Failure to return from work on time as evidence of intent to escape — Penalty.

In the event a prisoner placed under the work release program does not return to the workhouse at the time specified by the warden or the work release coordinator as a condition of being placed under the work release program, the failure to return shall constitute prima facie evidence of intent to escape and the prisoner shall thereby be subject to those penalties as are imposed or shall hereafter be imposed under the general law of this state for persons charged with the crime of escape.

Acts 1967, ch. 285, § 5; 1973, ch. 87, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-1248.

41-2-138. Monthly report to sentencing judge.

The warden of the workhouse shall file a monthly report with respect to each prisoner placed under the work release program with the judge by whom the prisoner was sentenced advising the judge as to the conduct and financial achievement of the prisoner.

Acts 1967, ch. 285, § 6; 1973, ch. 87, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-1249.

Cross-References. Roster of inmate release privileges, title 41, ch. 21, part 7.

41-2-139. Liability of participating prisoners for program costs.

Any prisoner placed under the work release program who has been convicted of a misdemeanor shall pay to the workhouse, for housing, board and administration of the program, the sum of not less than six dollars ($6.00) nor more than twenty-eight dollars ($28.00) for each day the prisoner works at employment away from the workhouse, in addition to any fine imposed by the court. The amount to be paid shall be determined by the board of commissioners established by § 41-2-134 and in accordance with § 41-2-129(b)(1).

Acts 1967, ch. 285, § 7; 1973, ch. 87, § 1; 1976, ch. 812, § 1; 1980, ch. 911, § 3; T.C.A., § 41-1250; Acts 1986, ch. 787, § 1.

41-2-140. Disbursement of wages — Duty of warden.

The warden of the workhouse shall be responsible for the receipt and disbursement of all wages earned by a participating prisoner, and the wages shall be received, disbursed and accounted for in the fashion directed by the finance director of a metropolitan government.

Acts 1967, ch. 285, § 8; 1973, ch. 87, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-1251.

41-2-141. Rules and regulations governing work release program.

The sheriff, the correctional/rehabilitation work release coordinator and the warden of the workhouse shall establish rules and regulations for the orderly operation of the work release program. The rules and regulations must be approved by the commission.

A violation of any rules and regulations so promulgated shall constitute cause for the removal of the prisoner from the program under the provisions of § 41-2-136.

Acts 1967, ch. 285, § 9; 1973, ch. 87, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-1252.

41-2-142. Furlough program.

All counties in the state having duly adopted a consolidated or metropolitan form of government pursuant to title 7, chapter 1 shall institute a furlough program for workhouse prisoners.

All counties having a population of six hundred thousand (600,000) or more, according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall institute a furlough program for county jail or workhouse prisoners.

Acts 1973, ch. 13, § 1; 1977, ch. 372, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-1253; Acts 1987, ch. 49, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Roster of inmate release privileges, title 41, ch. 21, part 7.

41-2-143. Conditions for furlough — Procedure.

Whenever any person has been committed to the county jail or county workhouse, any sheriff or workhouse superintendent of a county with a population of seven hundred thousand (700,000) or more, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, is authorized, in the official's sole discretion, to permit an inmate to leave the place of confinement on furlough under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed and promulgated by the sheriff or workhouse superintendent.

Whenever any person has been committed to the workhouse in a county having a metropolitan form of government, the metropolitan sheriff is authorized, in the sheriff's sole discretion, to permit an inmate to leave the place of confinement on furlough, under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed and promulgated by the sheriff.

All furloughs shall be made on an individual basis under reasonable conditions to inmates:

In the event of serious illness or death of a member of the inmate's immediate family;

Who is on the work release program; or

Who has remaining before the inmate's scheduled release date a certain maximum number of days, which maximum number of days shall be fixed by a schedule to be included in the rules and regulations prescribed and promulgated by the sheriff or workhouse superintendent.

Furlough will be for a maximum of three (3) days, unless a longer time is specifically authorized by the sheriff or workhouse superintendent, and shall be granted only to those with a record of behavior and conduct as to be worthy of the privilege.

Any inmate eligible to be granted a furlough by the sheriff, chief jail administrator or workhouse superintendent may make application to that superintendent or sheriff upon forms furnished by the workhouse or sheriff's department. The sheriff or the workhouse superintendent, after due consideration, may approve, reject or modify the request for furlough or may defer action on a request. The request shall be granted only upon notification of the furlough to the committing judge and to law enforcement authorities in the county of the prisoner's former residence.

Acts 1973, ch. 13, § 2; 1977, ch. 372, § 2; T.C.A., § 41-1254; Acts 1987, ch. 49, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

41-2-144. Inmate incentive program.

All counties in the state having duly adopted a consolidated or metropolitan form of government pursuant to title 7, chapter 1, and all counties of the state having a population of six hundred thousand (600,000) or more, according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall institute an inmate incentive program for workhouse prisoners, as set out in § 41-2-145.

Acts 1973, ch. 100, § 1; 1977, ch. 395, § 2; T.C.A., § 41-1255.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

41-2-145. Program and rating system — Reduction of time to serve.

The sheriff of any county having a consolidated or metropolitan form of government and all counties of the state having a population of six hundred thousand (600,000) or more, according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall develop an inmate incentive program for workhouse prisoners, whereby credit may be given toward the reduction of time that an inmate is required to serve for the inmate's participation in academic or vocational education classes sponsored by the consolidated or metropolitan government and all counties of the state having a population of six hundred thousand (600,000) or more, according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and for above average performance in the inmate's job placement, on the basis of a rating system devised by the sheriff.

In all other counties, the sheriff or superintendent may develop an inmate incentive program for workhouse prisoners whereby credit may be given toward the reduction of time that an inmate is required to serve for the inmate's participation in academic or vocational education classes on the basis of a rating system.

The program and rating system shall be approved by a three-member commission established pursuant to § 41-2-134. The commission shall be the same commission as set up to oversee the work release program.

All reductions in time to be served by the prisoners shall be approved by the commission. Those credits of time shall be in addition to any other credits toward sentence reduction to which workhouse inmates are entitled by provisions of any other law.

The sheriff is authorized to develop a schedule whereby an inmate is credited with a certain amount of time for active participation in an academic or vocational training program for a certain number of days and with a certain amount of time for maintaining a rating of above average job performance for a certain number of days.

Those credits on time shall be in addition to any other credits toward sentence reduction to which workhouse inmates are entitled by any other law.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a county sheriff may create an inmate reentry education program. The successful completion of a reentry education program may allow an inmate to qualify for an educational sentence reduction credit of sixty (60) days if the inmate successfully receives a high school equivalency credential, high school diploma, vocational education diploma, or other postsecondary or industry-recognized certification. No credit will be given for any credential, diploma, degree, or certification unless the course of study, including the institution or entity through which the credential, diploma, degree, or certification is offered, has received the prior approval of the department of correction.

Acts 1973, ch. 100, § 2; 1977, ch. 395, § 3; T.C.A., § 41-1256; Acts 1986, ch. 744, §§ 22, 23; 2019, ch. 346, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 346, § 2. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Sentence reduction credits, § 41-21-236.

41-2-146. Workhouse or jail maintenance work — Reduction of sentence for inmate labor.

When any prisoner has been sentenced to imprisonment in a county workhouse or jail or is serving time in the county jail or workhouse pursuant to an agreement with the department of correction, the sheriff or superintendent of the county shall be authorized to permit the prisoner to participate in work programs.

Work performed by the prisoner under this section shall be credited toward reduction of the prisoner's sentence in the following manner: for each one (1) day worked on such duties by the prisoner the sentence shall be reduced by two (2) days.

Acts 1980, ch. 688, § 1; 1981, ch. 276, §§ 1-5; T.C.A., § 41-1257; Acts 1986, ch. 744, § 24.

Cross-References. Certain prisoners in local jails or workhouses, release on work-related programs, § 41-2-147.

Attorney General Opinions. Board of probation and parole has no authority to remove sentence credits earned in local jail or workhouse pursuant to T.C.A. §§ 41-2-123, 41-2-146, 41-2-147 or 41-21-236, OAG 05-031, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 31 (3/29/05).

41-2-147. Certain prisoners in local jails or workhouses — Eligibility for work-related programs — Credits.

The sheriff or administrative authority having responsibility for the custody of any person sentenced to a local jail or workhouse pursuant to former § 40-35-302 [repealed], § 40-35-306 [repealed], § 40-35-307 [repealed] or § 40-35-311 [repealed] or present § 40-35-302, § 40-35-306, § 40-35-307 or § 40-35-314 shall, when a person has become eligible for work related programs pursuant to those sections, be authorized to permit the person to perform any of the duties set out in § 41-2-123 or § 41-2-146.

Work performed by a prisoner under this section shall be credited toward reduction of the prisoner's sentence in the following manner: for each one (1) day worked on such duties by the prisoner the sentence shall be reduced by two (2) days.

Any prisoner receiving sentence credits under this section shall not be eligible for the sentence reduction authorized by § 41-2-111.

Acts 1984, ch. 841, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The references in this section to “former § 40-35-302 [repealed], § 40-35-306 [repealed], § 40-35-307 [repealed] or § 40-35-311 [repealed]” refer to those sections in the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1982, which was repealed effective November 1, 1989. The references to “present § 40-35-302, § 40-35-306, § 40-35-307 or § 40-35-314” refer to parallel provisions in the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989.

Cross-References. Sentence reduction credits, § 41-21-236.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 32.125.

Attorney General Opinions. Sentence credits for inmates of county jails and workhouses, OAG 96-061, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 68 (4/4/96).

Workhouse inmates eligible to earn sentence credits under this section can earn the credits for working for a private employer if the labor is part of a court-approved work release program or a work release program operated under a commission established pursuant to T.C.A. § 41-2-134, OAG 03-125, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 145 (9/29/03).

Board of probation and parole has no authority to remove sentence credits earned in local jail or workhouse pursuant to T.C.A. §§ 41-2-123, 41-2-146, 41-2-147 or 41-21-236, OAG 05-031, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 31 (3/29/05).

41-2-148. Inmate labor for private purposes — Travel restrictions.

No sheriff, jailer or other person responsible for the care and custody of inmates housed in a county or municipal jail or workhouse may employ, require or otherwise use any inmate housed in the jail or workhouse to perform labor that will or may result directly or indirectly in the sheriff's, jailer's or other person's personal gain, profit or benefit or in gain, profit or benefit to a business partially or wholly owned by the sheriff, jailer or other person. This subsection (a) shall apply regardless of whether the inmate is or is not compensated for the labor.

No sheriff, jailer or other person responsible for the care and custody of inmates housed in a county or municipal jail or workhouse may permit any inmate housed in the jail or workhouse to perform any labor for the gain, profit or benefit of a private citizen or for-profit corporation, partnership or other business, unless the labor is part of a court-approved work release program or unless the work release program operates under a commission established pursuant to § 41-2-134.

Inmates housed in a county or municipal jail or workhouse may perform any labor on behalf of a charitable organization or a nonprofit corporation.

Subject to the approval of the board of regents, inmates of a county or municipal jail or workhouse may perform any labor on behalf of a farm that is operated by any institution that is under the jurisdiction of the board of regents.

No sheriff, jailer or other person responsible for the care and custody of inmates housed in a county or municipal jail or workhouse may permit any inmate housed in the jail or workhouse to leave this state, unless such travel is approved by the sentencing court, unless the inmate is in need of emergency medical treatment available only in another state or there is a death or medical emergency in the inmate's immediate family.

Any sheriff, jailer or other person responsible for the custody of an inmate housed in a local facility who violates this section, upon the person's first conviction for the violation, commits a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine equal to the value of the services received from the inmate or inmates and imprisonment for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than eleven (11) months and twenty-nine (29) days. Upon a second or subsequent conviction for a violation of this section, the sheriff, jailer or other person is guilty of a felony and shall be punished by a fine of not less than the value of the services received from the inmate or inmates nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and imprisonment for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years. If the person violating this section for the second or subsequent time is a public official, in addition to the punishment set out in this subdivision (d)(1), the person shall immediately forfeit the person's office and shall be forever barred from holding public office in this state.

Any private citizen, corporation, partnership or other business knowingly and willfully using inmate labor in violation of subsection (b) commits a Class A misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) and by imprisonment for not more than eleven (11) months and twenty-nine (29) days. Each day inmate labor is used in violation of subsection (b) constitutes a separate offense.

Acts 1985, ch. 130, § 1; 1989, ch. 48, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 2011, ch. 224, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor and felony in (d)(1) have been designated as Class A and Class E, respectively, by authority of § 40-35-110, which provides that offenses designated misdemeanors without specification as to category are Class A and felonies without specification as to category are Class E. See also § 39-11-114.

The undesignated misdemeanor and felony offenses in this section may be affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§ 39-11-113, 39-11-114, 40-35-110, 40-35-111.

Cross-References. Inmate labor for private purposes, travel restrictions, § 41-3-106.

Jails and jailers, title 41, ch. 4.

Official misconduct, § 39-16-402.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Penalty for Class E felony, § 40-35-111.

Road work by prisoners, § 41-2-123.

Sentence reduction credits, § 41-21-236.

Unlawful use of inmates, Class E felony, § 4-6-139.

Use of inmates for personal gain, § 4-6-138.

Attorney General Opinions. Inmate labor may benefit private party, OAG 03-075, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 91 (6/18/03).

41-2-149. Work release programs — Litter removal — Participation.

Except as provided in subsection (b), all persons sentenced to the county workhouse, either for a felony or misdemeanor conviction, in counties with an existing work release program whereby, among other things, prisoners remove litter and trash from public roads and other public areas, may be required to participate in the litter removal portion of that work release program during the period of the person's incarceration.

The only exceptions to the requirements of subsection (a) shall be for those persons who, in the opinion of the sheriff or the superintendent of the jail, would present a security risk or a danger to the public if allowed to leave the confines of the jail or workhouse and those persons who, in the opinion of a licensed physician, should not perform the labor for medical reasons.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as making persons convicted of the offense of driving under the influence of an intoxicant as prohibited by § 55-10-401 eligible to participate in a work release program, a litter removal program or receive sentence reduction credits as authorized by this section, nor shall this section be construed as altering or decreasing the penalties established by law for that offense.

All persons participating in the work release program required by this section shall receive sentence reduction credits for the work at the same rate as is provided in § 41-2-123(b)(3).

Acts 1989, ch. 511, §§ 1, 3.

Cross-References. Road work by prisoners, § 41-2-123.

Sentence reduction credits, § 41-21-236.